Utah statutes.
4-33-10.   Interstate commerce -- Chapter inapplicable to fuel in transit through state.

This chapter is inapplicable to motor fuel being transported through this state in interstate commerce; provided, that none of the motor fuel is consigned or destined for delivery in the state. 

